closure.aff
# Most of the following is based on:
#
# - M. Grossmann, F. Rainer; La formazione delle Parole in Italiano; pg. 97-492
#    (2004)
# - https://www.treccani.it/enciclopedia/plurale-dei-nomi_%28La-grammatica-italiana%29/
# - https://www.treccani.it/enciclopedia/parole-enclitiche_%28Enciclopedia-dell%27Italiano%29/
# - https://it.wikipedia.org/wiki/Verbi_irregolari_italiani
#
# You are free to reuse and modify this source. Feel free to report any errors.
#
# NOTE: Only the most productive rules are listed here. Moreover, some rules
# attributable to multiple grammatical categories are listed only once in order
# to reduce duplicates.
#


FULLSTRIP


# entry point
SFX ^ N 17
SFX ^    0  /MFS  [^àèéìòù']
SFX ^    0  /AN   [^àèéìòù']
SFX ^    0  /oa
SFX ^   à   a/AN
SFX ^   è   e/AN
SFX ^   é   e/AN
SFX ^   ì   i/AN
SFX ^   ò   o/AN
SFX ^   ù   u/AN
SFX ^    0  e/Vv     [aei]r
SFX ^    0  /Vv      [aei]re
SFX ^    0  /Vv     [aou]rre
SFX ^ rsi  re/Vv    [aei]rsi
SFX ^ rsi rre/Vv      trarsi
SFX ^ rsi rre/Vv       porsi
SFX ^ rsi rre/Vv       dursi
SFX ^    0  /Vv          ing


SFX M N 8
SFX Masc         a       o
SFX Masc         a       e
SFX Masc_n    essa       a [^h]essa
SFX Masc_n   hessa       a
SFX Masc_n    essa       e [^h]essa
SFX Masc_n   trice    tore
SFX Masc_n ditrice    sore
SFX Masc_n ditrice   ssore

SFX F N 8
SFX Femm         o       a
SFX Femm         e       a
SFX Femm_n       a    essa
SFX Femm_n       a   hessa    [cg]a
SFX Femm_n       e    essa
SFX Femm_n    tore   trice
SFX Femm_n    sore ditrice [^s]sore
SFX Femm_n   ssore ditrice


SFX S N 11
SFX Sing_1   i  a
SFX Sing_1  hi  a [cg]hi
SFX Sing_1   i ia  [cg]i
SFX Sing_1   e  a
SFX Sing_1  he  a [cg]hi
SFX Sing_1   e ia  [cg]i
SFX Sing_2   i  o
SFX Sing_2  hi  o [cg]hi
SFX Sing_2   i io
SFX Sing_3   i  e
SFX Sing_3   i ie

SFX P N 11
SFX Plur_1m  a  i
SFX Plur_1m  a hi  [cg]a
SFX Plur_1m ia  i [cg]ia
SFX Plur_1f  a  e
SFX Plur_1f  a he  [cg]a
SFX Plur_1f ia  e [cg]ia
SFX Plur_2   o  i
SFX Plur_2   o hi  [cg]o
SFX Plur_2  io  i
SFX Plur_3   e  i
SFX Plur_3  ie  i


SFX T N 5
SFX Trnc a  /t  a
SFX Trnc e  /t  e
SFX Trnc i  /t  i
SFX Trnc o  /t  o
SFX Trnc u  /t  u

SFX t N 1
SFX trnc  0 '
